Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.1691, subdivision 2g, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-07710 216B.1691 RENEWABLE ENERGY OBJECTIVES. Subd. 2g. Carbon-free standard. In addition to the requirements under subdivisions 2a and 2f, each electric utility must generate or procure sufficient electricity generated from a carbon-free energy technology to provide the electric utility's retail customers in Minnesota, or the retail customers of a distribution utility to which the electric utility provides wholesale electric service, so that the electric utility generates or procures an amount of electricity from carbon-free energy technologies that is equivalent to at least the following standard percentages of the electric utility's total retail electric sales to retail customers in Minnesota by the end of the year indicated: (1) 2030 80 percent for public utilities; 60 percent for other electric utilities (2) 2035 90 percent for all electric utilities (3) 2040 100 percent for all electric utilities.